Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 1. Assisted Living Facilities.
§ 63.2-1805.
Admissions and discharge; mandatory minimum liability insurance.

The Board shall adopt regulations:

Governing admissions to assisted living facilities;

Requiring that each assisted living facility prepare and provide a statement, in a format prescribed by the Department, to any prospective resident and his legal representative, if any, prior to admission and upon request, that discloses information, fully and accurately in plain language, about the (i) services; (ii) fees, including clear information about what services are included in the base fee and any fees for additional services; (iii) admission, transfer, and discharge criteria, including criteria for transfer to another level of care within the same facility or complex; (iv) general number and qualifications of staff on each shift; (v) range, frequency, and number of activities provided for residents; and (vi) ownership structure of the facility;

Establishing a process to ensure that each resident admitted or retained in an assisted living facility receives appropriate services and periodic independent reassessments and reassessments when there is a significant change in the resident’s condition in order to determine whether a resident’s needs can continue to be met by the facility and whether continued placement in the facility is in the best interests of the resident;

Governing appropriate discharge planning for residents whose care needs can no longer be met by the facility;

Addressing the involuntary discharge of residents. Such regulations shall provide that residents may be involuntarily discharged only (i) in accordance with Board regulations, provided that the assisted living facility has met the requirements of subsection B, as applicable, and the assisted living facility has made reasonable efforts to meet the needs of the resident; (ii) for nonpayment of contracted charges, provided that the resident has been given at least 30 days to cure the delinquency after notice was provided to the resident and the resident’s legal representative or designated contact person of such nonpayment; (iii) for the resident’s failure to substantially comply with the terms and conditions, as allowed by regulation, of the resident agreement between the resident and assisted living facility; (iv) if the assisted living facility closes in accordance with Board regulations; or (v) when the resident develops a condition or care need that is prohibited by subsection D or Board regulations. Unless an emergency discharge is necessary due to an immediate and serious risk to the health, safety, or welfare of the resident or others, the assisted living facility shall, prior to involuntarily discharging a resident, make reasonable efforts, as appropriate, to resolve any issues with the resident upon which the decision to discharge is based and document such efforts in the resident’s file.

In addition to providing the written discharge notice to the resident and the resident’s legal representative or designated contact person, the assisted living facility shall provide a copy of the notice to the Department and the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman at least 30 days prior to an involuntary discharge unless an emergency discharge is necessary due to an immediate and serious risk to the health, safety, or welfare of the resident or others. Such notice of discharge shall include the reasons for discharge, the date on which the discharge will occur, and information regarding the resident’s right to appeal, within the 30-day notice period, the assisted living facility’s decision to discharge the resident.

In cases of an emergency discharge, such notice shall be provided as soon as possible, but no later than five days after the emergency discharge. Within five days after an emergency discharge, the written discharge notice shall be provided to the resident, the resident’s legal representative or designated contact person, the Department, and the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman. A resident may appeal any discharge except discharges pursuant to clause (iv).

The Department shall provide the discharge notice form to be used by assisted living facilities to provide notice to a resident of the resident’s right to appeal such facility’s decision to discharge the resident, which shall also include information regarding the process for initiating an appeal, the number for a toll-free information line, a hearing request form, the facility’s obligation to assist the resident in filing an appeal and provide, upon request, a postage prepaid envelope addressed to the Department, and a statement of the resident’s right to continue to reside in the facility, free from retaliation, until the appeal has a final Department case decision unless the discharge is an emergency discharge or the resident has developed a condition or care need that is prohibited by subsection D or Board regulations. Where a resident has been removed under an emergency discharge and no longer resides in the facility, the resident retains the right to appeal.

Prior to involuntarily discharging a resident, the assisted living facility shall provide relocation assistance to the resident and the resident’s legal representative in accordance with Board regulation. The Board shall adopt regulations that establish a process for appeals filed pursuant to this subdivision;

Requiring that residents are informed of their rights pursuant to §

63.2-1808

at the time of admission;

Establishing a process to ensure that any resident temporarily detained in a facility pursuant to §§

37.2-809

through

37.2-813

is accepted back in the assisted living facility if the resident is not involuntarily admitted pursuant to §§

37.2-814

through

37.2-819

;

Requiring that each assisted living facility train all employees who are mandated to report adult abuse, neglect, or exploitation pursuant to §

63.2-1606

on such reporting procedures and the consequences for failing to make a required report;

Requiring that each assisted living facility prepare and provide a statement, in a format prescribed by the Board, to any resident or prospective resident and his legal representative, if any, and upon request, that discloses whether the assisted living facility maintains liability insurance in force to compensate residents or other individuals for injuries and losses from the negligent acts of the facility, provided that no facility shall state that liability insurance is in place unless such insurance provides a minimum amount of coverage as established by the Board;

Establishing the minimum amount of liability insurance coverage to be maintained by an assisted living facility for purposes of disclosure in accordance with subdivision 9; and

Requiring that all assisted living facilities disclose to each prospective resident, or his legal representative, in writing in a document provided to the prospective resident or his legal representative and as evidenced by the written acknowledgment of the resident or his legal representative on the same document, whether the facility has an on-site emergency electrical power source for the provision of electricity during an interruption of the normal electric power supply and, if the assisted living facility does have an on-site emergency electrical power source, (i) the items for which such on-site emergency electrical power source will supply power in the event of an interruption of the normal electric power supply and (ii) whether staff of the assisted living facility have been trained to maintain and operate such on-site emergency electrical power source to ensure the provision of electricity during an interruption of the normal electrical power supply. For the purposes of this subdivision, an on-site emergency electrical power supply shall include both permanent emergency electrical power supply sources and portable emergency electrical power sources, provided that such temporary electrical power supply source remains on the premises of the assisted living facility at all times. Written acknowledgement of the disclosure shall be represented by the signature or initials of the resident or his legal representative immediately following the on-site emergency electrical power source disclosure statement.

If there are observed behaviors or patterns of behavior indicative of mental illness, intellectual disability, substance abuse, or behavioral disorders, as documented in the uniform assessment instrument completed pursuant to §

63.2-1804

, the facility administrator or designated staff member shall ensure that an evaluation of the individual is or has been conducted by a qualified professional as defined in regulations. If the evaluation indicates a need for mental health, developmental, substance abuse, or behavioral disorder services, the facility shall provide (i) a notification of the resident’s need for such services to the authorized contact person of record when available and (ii) a notification of the resident’s need for such services to the community services board or behavioral health authority established pursuant to Title 37.2 that serves the city or county in which the facility is located, or other appropriate licensed provider. The Department shall not take adverse action against a facility that has demonstrated and documented a continual good faith effort to meet the requirements of this subsection.

The Department shall not order the removal of a resident from an assisted living facility if (i) the resident, the resident’s family, the resident’s physician, and the facility consent to the resident’s continued stay in the assisted living facility and (ii) the facility is capable of providing, obtaining, or arranging for the provision of necessary services for the resident, including, but not limited to, home health care or hospice care.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection C, assisted living facilities shall not admit or retain an individual with any of the following conditions or care needs:

Ventilator dependency.

Dermal ulcers III and IV, except those stage III ulcers that are determined by an independent physician to be healing.

Intravenous therapy or injections directly into the vein except for intermittent intravenous therapy managed by a health care professional licensed in Virginia or as permitted in subsection E.

Airborne infectious disease in a communicable state that requires isolation of the individual or requires special precautions by the caretaker to prevent transmission of the disease, including diseases such as tuberculosis and excluding infections such as the common cold.

Psychotropic medications without appropriate diagnosis and treatment plans.

Nasogastric tubes.

Gastric tubes except when the individual is capable of independently feeding himself and caring for the tube or as permitted in subsection E.

An imminent physical threat or danger to self or others is presented by the individual.

Continuous licensed nursing care (seven-days-a-week, 24-hours-a-day) is required by the individual.

Placement is no longer appropriate as certified by the individual’s physician.

Maximum physical assistance is required by the individual as documented by the uniform assessment instrument and the individual meets Medicaid nursing facility level-of-care criteria as defined in the State Plan for Medical Assistance, unless the individual’s independent physician determines otherwise. Maximum physical assistance means that an individual has a rating of total dependence in four or more of the seven activities of daily living as documented on the uniform assessment instrument.

The assisted living facility determines that it cannot meet the individual’s physical or mental health care needs.

Other medical and functional care needs that the Board determines cannot be met properly in an assisted living facility.

Except for auxiliary grant recipients, at the request of the resident in an assisted living facility and when his independent physician determines that it is appropriate, (i) care for the conditions or care needs defined in subdivisions D 3 and D 7 may be provided to the resident by a licensed physician, a licensed nurse or a nurse holding a multistate licensure privilege under a physician’s treatment plan, or a home care organization licensed in Virginia or (ii) care for the conditions or care needs defined in subdivision D 7 may also be provided to the resident by facility staff if the care is delivered in accordance with the regulations of the Board of Nursing for delegation by a registered nurse Part VIII (18VAC90-20-420 et seq.) of 18VAC90-20.

The Board shall adopt regulations to implement the provisions of this subsection.

In adopting regulations pursuant to subsections A, B, C, D, and E, the Board shall consult with the Departments of Health and Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.

History.

1993, cc. 957, 993, § 63.1-174.001; 1995, cc. 649, 844; 2000, c. 176; 2002, c. 747; 2004, c. 49; 2005, cc. 610, 716, 724, 924; 2007, c. 539; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2012, cc. 476, 507; 2013, c. 320; 2019, c. 602; 2022, c. 706.

Cross references.

For hospice care notwithstanding this section, see §

63.2-1806

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 5 provides: “That the Board of Long-Term Care Administrators shall convene a task force to develop licensing regulations for assisted living facility administrators and submit an initial progress report by November 1, 2005, and a follow-up progress report by November 1, 2006, on such regulations to the chairmen of the Joint Commission on Health Care, the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions, and the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Long-Term Care Administrators shall adopt final regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective on or before July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 8 provides: “That the State Board of Social Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 10 provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall develop a training module on assisted living facilities, including all applicable statutes and regulations, that shall be used to train all adult care licensing inspectors currently employed by the Department no later than October 1, 2005. Any person subsequently employed as an adult care inspector shall receive such training no later than 60 days following the commencement of employment.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 11 provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall seek consultation and information from all relevant agencies of government in its development of regulations and policies to implement the provisions of the act. The Department of Social Services shall integrate into the regulations and policies standards that are consistent with the recommendations of the Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services] necessary to ensure appropriate care for residents with mental illness, mental retardation, substance abuse, and other behavioral disabilities. The Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services] shall cooperate fully in the development of these standards.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 49 substituted “24-hours-a-day” for “twenty-four-hours-a-day” in subdivision B 9, and inserted “or a nurse holding a multistate licensure privilege” in subsection C.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 610 and 924 are virtually identical, and inserted subdivision A 2, and redesignated remaining subsdivisions accordingly; rewrote subdivision 3; inserted subsection B and redesignated remaining subsections accordingly; in subsection C, substitutes “an individual” for “individuals”
in the introductory language; in subdivisions C 3 and C 7, substitutes “D” for “C”; rewrote subdivisions C 8 through C 13; in subsection D, substituted “C” for “B” two times and deleted “by” preceding “a home care organization”; and inserted “and D” in subsection E.

The 2005 amendment by c. 716, effective October 1, 2005, in subdivision A 6, substituted “a” for “an inpatient” preceding “facility pursuant,” “§§

37.2-809

through

37.2-813

” for “§ 37.1-67.1,” “admitted” for “committed,” and “§§

37.2-814

through

37.2-819

” for “§ 37.67.3”; and substituted “that” for “which” in subdivision C 2 and deleted a comma after “communicable state” in C 4.

The 2005 amendment by c. 724 rewrote subsection D.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 539 added subsection C; redesignated former subsections C through E as present subsections D through F; in subsection D, added “Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection C above” at the beginning of the introductory paragraph and substituted “subsection E” for “subsection D” in subdivisions D 3 and D 7; and inserted “and E” following “and D” in subsection F.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services” in subsection F.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and in subsection B, substituted “intellectual disability” for “mental retardation” in the first sentence, and “developmental” for “mental retardation” in the second sentence; deleted “above” following “subsection C” in the introductory paragraph of subsection D; and substituted “Part VIII (18 VAC 90-20-420 et seq.) of 18 VAC 90-20” for “18 VAC 90-20-420 et seq.” at the end of the first paragraph of subsection E.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 320 added subdivisions A 9 and A 10 and made related changes; substituted “or hospice” for “and/or hospice” near the end of subsection C.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 602 added subdivision A 11; and made stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 706, rewrote subdivision A 5, which read: “Addressing the involuntary discharge of residents.”

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 441 (2007).

§ 63.2-1806.
Hospice care.

Notwithstanding §

63.2-1805

, at the request of the resident, hospice care may be provided in an assisted living facility under the same requirements for hospice programs provided in Article 7 (§

32.1-162.1

et seq.) of Chapter 5 of Title 32.1, if the hospice program determines that such program is appropriate for the resident. However, to the extent allowed by federal law, no assisted living facility shall be required to provide or allow hospice care if such hospice care restrictions are included in a disclosure statement that is signed by the resident prior to admission.

History.

1995, c. 649, § 63.1-174.2; 2002, c. 747; 2003, c. 526; 2007, c. 397; 2016, c. 598.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 526 added the last paragraph.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 397 deleted the second paragraph.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 598 added the second sentence.

§ 63.2-1807.
Certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation; do not resuscitate orders.

The owners or operators of any assisted living facility may provide that their employees who are certified in cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) shall not be required to resuscitate any resident for whom a valid written order not to resuscitate in the event of cardiac or respiratory arrest has been issued by the attending physician and has been included in the resident’s individualized service plan.

History.

1996, c. 775, § 63.1-174.3; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1808.
Rights and responsibilities of residents of assisted living facilities; certification of licensure.

Any resident of an assisted living facility has the rights and responsibilities enumerated in this section. The operator or administrator of an assisted living facility shall establish written policies and procedures to ensure that, at the minimum, each person who becomes a resident of the assisted living facility:

Is fully informed, prior to or at the time of admission and during the resident’s stay, of his rights and of all rules and expectations governing the resident’s conduct, responsibilities, and the terms of the admission agreement; evidence of this shall be the resident’s written acknowledgment of having been so informed, which shall be filed in his record;

Is fully informed, prior to or at the time of admission and during the resident’s stay, of services available in the facility and of any related charges; this shall be reflected by the resident’s signature on a current resident’s agreement retained in the resident’s file;

Unless a committee or conservator has been appointed, is free to manage his personal finances and funds regardless of source; is entitled to access to personal account statements reflecting financial transactions made on his behalf by the facility; and is given at least a quarterly accounting of financial transactions made on his behalf when a written delegation of responsibility to manage his financial affairs is made to the facility for any period of time in conformance with state law;

Is afforded confidential treatment of his personal affairs and records and may approve or refuse their release to any individual outside the facility except as otherwise provided in law and except in case of his transfer to another care-giving facility;

Is transferred or discharged only when provided with a statement of reasons, or for nonpayment for his stay, and is given reasonable advance notice; upon notice of discharge or upon giving reasonable advance notice of his desire to move, shall be afforded reasonable assistance to ensure an orderly transfer or discharge; such actions shall be documented in his record;

In the event a medical condition should arise while he is residing in the facility, is afforded the opportunity to participate in the planning of his program of care and medical treatment at the facility and the right to refuse treatment;

Is not required to perform services for the facility except as voluntarily contracted pursuant to a voluntary agreement for services that states the terms of consideration or remuneration and is documented in writing and retained in his record;

Is free to select health care services from reasonably available resources;

Is free to refuse to participate in human subject experimentation or to be party to research in which his identity may be ascertained;

Is free from mental, emotional, physical, sexual, and economic abuse or exploitation; is free from forced isolation, threats or other degrading or demeaning acts against him; and his known needs are not neglected or ignored by personnel of the facility;

Is treated with courtesy, respect, and consideration as a person of worth, sensitivity, and dignity;

Is encouraged, and informed of appropriate means as necessary, throughout the period of stay to exercise his rights as a resident and as a citizen; to this end, he is free to voice grievances and recommend changes in policies and services, free of coercion, discrimination, threats or reprisal;

Is permitted to retain and use his personal clothing and possessions as space permits unless to do so would infringe upon rights of other residents;

Is encouraged to function at his highest mental, emotional, physical and social potential;

Is free of physical or mechanical restraint except in the following situations and with appropriate safeguards:

As necessary for the facility to respond to unmanageable behavior in an emergency situation, which threatens the immediate safety of the resident or others;

As medically necessary, as authorized in writing by a physician, to provide physical support to a weakened resident;

In communications, in writing or by telephone;

During visitations with other persons;

In the resident’s room or portion thereof; residents shall be permitted to have guests or other residents in their rooms unless to do so would infringe upon the rights of other residents; staff may not enter a resident’s room without making their presence known except in an emergency or in accordance with safety oversight requirements included in regulations of the Board;

In visits with his spouse; if both are residents of the facility they are permitted but not required to share a room unless otherwise provided in the residents’ agreements;

If the resident is unable to fully understand and exercise the rights and responsibilities contained in this section, the facility shall require that a responsible individual, of the resident’s choice when possible, designated in writing in the resident’s record, be made aware of each item in this section and the decisions that affect the resident or relate to specific items in this section; a resident shall be assumed capable of understanding and exercising these rights unless a physician determines otherwise and documents the reasons for such determination in the resident’s record.

The rights and responsibilities of residents shall be printed in at least 12-point type and posted conspicuously in a public place in all assisted living facilities. The facility shall also post the name and telephone number of the regional licensing supervisor of the Department, the Adult Protective Services’ toll-free telephone number, as well as the toll-free telephone number for the Virginia Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program, any sub-state ombudsman program serving the area, and the toll-free number of the Commonwealth’s designated protection and advocacy system.

The facility shall make its policies and procedures for implementing this section available and accessible to residents, relatives, agencies, and the general public.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to restrict or abridge any right that any resident has under law.

Each facility shall provide appropriate staff training to implement each resident’s rights included in this section.

The Board shall adopt regulations as necessary to carry out the full intent of this section.

It shall be the responsibility of the Commissioner to ensure that the provisions of this section are observed and implemented by assisted living facilities as a condition to the issuance, renewal, or continuation of the license required by this article.

16.

Is free of prescription drugs except where medically necessary, specifically prescribed, and supervised by the attending physician, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner;

17.

Is accorded respect for ordinary privacy in every aspect of daily living, including but not limited to the following:

a.

In the care of his personal needs except as assistance may be needed;

b.

In any medical examination or health-related consultations the resident may have at the facility;

18.

Is permitted to meet with and participate in activities of social, religious, and community groups at his discretion unless medically contraindicated as documented by his physician, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner in his medical record;

19.

Is fully informed, as evidenced by the written acknowledgment of the resident or his legal representative, prior to or at the time of admission and during his stay, that he should exercise whatever due diligence he deems necessary with respect to information on any sex offenders registered pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

9.1-900

et seq.) of Title 9.1, including how to obtain such information. Upon request, the assisted living facility shall assist the resident, prospective resident, or the legal representative of the resident or prospective resident in accessing this information and provide the resident, prospective resident, or the legal representative of the resident or prospective resident with printed copies of the requested information; and

20.

Is informed, in writing and upon request, of whether the assisted living facility maintains the minimum liability coverage, as established by the Board pursuant to subdivision A 10 of §

63.2-1805

.

History.

1984, c. 677, § 63.1-182.1; 1989, c. 271; 1990, c. 458; 1992, c. 356; 1993, cc. 957, 993; 1997, c. 801; 2000, c. 177; 2002, cc. 45, 572, 747; 2004, c. 855; 2006, c. 396; 2007, cc. 120, 163; 2013, cc. 320, 571.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, cc. 45 and 572 amended § 63.1-182.1, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2002, cc. 45 and 572 have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2002 amendment by c. 45, in subsection C, deleted “All established policies and procedures regarding” at the beginning of the first sentence and substituted “also post” for “include in them” in the second sentence. In addition, the amendment substituted “facility” for “residence” throughout, which had also been done by c. 747.

The 2002 amendment by c. 572 substituted “Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy” for “Department for the Rights of Virginians With Disabilities” at the end of subsection C.

Acts 2004, c. 855, cl. 2 provides: “That this act shall take effect 60 days following the effective date of the regulations promulgated by the Board of Medicine and Board of Nursing required by the third enactment clause of this act.” Emergency regulations took effect July 15, 2004.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 855 inserted “or nurse practitioner” in subdivisions A 16 and A 18 and substituted “12-point type” for “twelve point type” in subsection C and “that” for “which” in subsection E. For effective date, see Editor’s note.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 396 inserted “physician assistant” in subdivisions A 16 and A 18.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 120 and 163 are identical, and added subdivision A 19 and made related changes.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 320 added subdivision A 20 and made related changes.

The 2013 amendment by c. 571 substituted “Commonwealth’s designated protection and advocacy system” for “Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy” in the last sentence in subsection C.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Hospitals and Sanitariums, § 7.1.

§ 63.2-1808.1.
Life-sharing communities.

For the purposes of this section:“Life-sharing community” means a residential setting, operated by a nonprofit organization, that (i) offers a safe environment in free standing, self-contained homes for residents that have been determined by a licensed health-care professional as having at least one developmental disability; (ii) is an environment located in a community setting where residents participate in therapeutic activities including artistic crafts, stewardship of the land, and agricultural activities; (iii) consists of the residents as well as staff and volunteers who live together in residential homes; (iv) operates at a ratio of at least one staff member, volunteer, or supervising personnel for every three residents in each self-contained home household; and (v) has at least one supervisory staff member on premises to be responsible for the care, safety, and supervision of the residents at all times.“Resident” means an individual who has been determined by a physician or nurse practitioner to have at least one developmental disability and who resides at the life-sharing community on a full-time basis.“Volunteer” means an individual who resides in the life-sharing community on a full-time basis and who assists residents with their daily activities and receives no wages. A volunteer may receive a small stipend for personal expenses.

Any facility seeking to operate as a life-sharing community shall file with the Commissioner: (i) a statement of intent to operate as a life-sharing community; (ii) a certification that at the time of admission, a contract and written notice was provided to each resident and his legally authorized representative that includes a statement of disclosure that the facility is exempt from licensure as an “assisted living facility,” and (iii) documentary evidence that such life-sharing community is a private nonprofit organization in accordance with 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended.

Upon filing an initial statement of intent to operate as a life-sharing community, and every two years thereafter, the life-sharing community shall certify that the local health department, building inspector, fire marshal, or other local official designated by the locality to enforce the Statewide Fire Prevention Code, and any other local official required by law to inspect the premises, have inspected the physical facilities of the life-sharing community and have determined that the facility is in compliance with all applicable laws and regulations with regard to food service activities, health and sanitation, water supply, building codes, and the Statewide Fire Prevention Code and the Uniform Statewide Building Code.

Upon filing an initial statement of intent to operate as a life-sharing community, and every two years thereafter, the life-sharing community shall provide the Commissioner documentary evidence that:

Life-sharing community staff and volunteers have completed a training program that includes instruction in personal care of residents, house management, and therapeutic activities;

Volunteers and staff have completed first aid and Cardio-Pulmonary Resuscitation training;

Each resident’s needs are evaluated using the Uniform Assessment Instrument, and Individual Service Plans are developed for each resident annually;

The residents of the life-sharing community are each 21 years of age or older;

A criminal background check through the Criminal Records Exchange has been completed for each (i) full-time salaried staff member and (ii) volunteer as defined in this section.

A residential facility operating as a life-sharing facility shall be exempt from the licensing requirements of Article 1 (§

63.2-1800

et seq.) of Chapter 18 of Title 63.2 applicable to assisted living facilities.

The Commissioner may perform unannounced on-site inspections of a life-sharing community to determine compliance with the provisions of this section and to investigate any complaint that the life-sharing community is not in compliance with the provisions of this section, or to otherwise ensure the health, safety, and welfare of the life-sharing community residents. The Commissioner may revoke the exemption from licensure pursuant to this chapter for any life-sharing community for serious or repeated violation of the requirements of this section and order that the facility cease operations or comply with the licensure requirements of an assisted living facility. If a life-sharing community does not file the statement and documentary evidence required by this section, the Commissioner shall give reasonable notice to such life-sharing community of the nature of its noncompliance and may thereafter take action as he determines appropriate, including a suit to enjoin the operation of the life-sharing community.

All life-sharing communities shall provide access to their facilities and residents by staff of community services boards and behavioral health authorities as defined in §

37.2-100

for the purpose of (i) assessing or evaluating, (ii) providing case management or other services or assistance, or (iii) monitoring the care of individuals receiving services who are residing in the facility. Such staff or contractual agents also shall be given reasonable access to other facility residents who have previously requested their services.

Any residents of any life-sharing community shall be accorded the same rights and responsibilities as residents in assisted living facilities as provided in subsections A through F of §

63.2-1808

.

A life-sharing community shall not admit or retain individuals with any of the conditions or care needs as provided in subsection C of §

63.2-1805

.

Notwithstanding §

63.2-1805

, at the request of the resident, hospice care may be provided in a life-sharing community under the same requirements for hospice programs provided in Article 7 (§

32.1-162.1

et seq.) of Chapter 5 of Title 32.1 if the hospice program determines that such a program is appropriate for the resident.

History.

2007, c. 677; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the 2007 act having assigned no number.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “’Life-sharing community’ means a residential setting, operated by a nonprofit” for “’Life-sharing community’ is defined as a residential setting, operated by a non-profit”; in subsection B, substituted “nonprofit” for “non-profit” in clause (iii); and in subsection G, substituted “individuals receiving services who are” for “consumers” in clause (iii).